Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1303 N 1
SFX 1303 0 InformationData .

SFX 1304 N 1
SFX 1304 0 ing .

SFX 1305 N 1
SFX 1305 0 ingBy .

SFX 1306 N 1
SFX 1306 0 ingCopies .

SFX 1307 N 1
SFX 1307 0 ingFunction .

SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 0 ingLayer .

SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 0 ingNewlineSpacings .

SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 0 ingOptions .

SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 0 ingPageRange .

SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 0 ingRadius .

SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 0 ingRule .

SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 0 ingStartingPageNumber .

SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 0 ingStyleEnvironment .

SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 0 Initialization .

SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 0 InlineFormatType .

SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 0 Input .

SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 0 InputFormatType .

SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 0 InputFormPacket .

SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 0 InputStreamMethod .

SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 0 inscribed .

SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 0 Insert .

SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 0 Inset .

SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 0 inship .

SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 0 Install .

SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 0 InstallQueued .

SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 0 Instance .

SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 0 Integer .

SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 0 IntegerNullVector .

SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 0 Integers .

SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 0 Integral .

SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 0 IntegralE .

SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 0 IntegralEi .

SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 0 Integrals .

SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 0 Internal .

SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 0 InterpolatingFunction .

SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 0 Interpolation .

SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 0 Intersection .

SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 0 Intersections .

SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 0 Interval .

SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 0 Intervals .

SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 0 InvariantG2 .

SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 0 InvariantG3 .

SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 0 Invariantj .

SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 0 Invariants .

SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 0 Inverse .

SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 0 Invertibility .

SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 0 InvisibleCharacters .

SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 0 ion .

SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 0 ionAnimate .

SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 0 ionCell .

SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 0 ionCellCreateCell .

SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 0 ionCellDefaultStyle .

SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 0 ionCellParentStyle .

SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 0 ionCreateCell .

SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 0 ionDuplicateCell .

SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 0 ionEvaluate .

SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 0 ionEvaluateCreateCell .

SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 0 ionMove .

SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 0 ionPlaceholder .

SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 0 ionRoot .

SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 0 ionSetStyle .

SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 0 ionSort .

SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 0 irationDate .

SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 0 irationString .

SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 0 is .

SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 0 ishUmber .

SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 0 ism .

SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 0 istani .

SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 0 iste .

SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 0 istes .

SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 0 isticFunction .

SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 0 isticPolynomial .

SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 0 Italic .

SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 0 Item .

SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 0 itruncated .

SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 0 ity .

SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 0 ityFunction .

SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 0 ius .

SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 0 iveryFunction .

SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 0 ization .

SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 0 ize .

SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 0 ized .

SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 0 izeDegreeSequence .

SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 0 J .

SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 0 JacobiCD .

SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 0 JacobiCN .

SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 0 JacobiCS .

SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 0 JacobiDC .

SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 0 JacobiDN .

SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 0 JacobiDS .

SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 0 JacobiNC .

SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 0 JacobiND .

SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 0 JacobiNS .

SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 0 JacobiSC .

SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 0 JacobiSD .

SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 0 JacobiSN .

SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 0 Join .

SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 0 Joined .

SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 0 joule .

SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 0 joules .

SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 0 JPrimeYJYPrimeZeros .

SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 0 JPrimeYPrimeJPrimeYPrimeZeros .

SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 0 JPrimeZeros .

SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 0 JYJYZeros .

SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 0 JZero .

SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 0 JZeros .

SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 K .

SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 ka .

SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 katal .

SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 katals .

SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 KClan .

SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 KClique .

SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 KClub .

SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 ke .

SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 kelvin .

SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 kelvins .

SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 Kernels .

SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 Key .

SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 0 KeyMapping .

SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 0 Keys .

SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 0 ki .

SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 0 Kind .

SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 0 KPlex .

SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 0 KroneckerDelta .

SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 0 KSubset .

SFX 1428 N 1
SFX 1428 0 Kutta .

SFX 1429 N 1
SFX 1429 0 KuttaMethod .

SFX 1430 N 1
SFX 1430 0 KuttaOrderConditions .

SFX 1431 N 1
SFX 1431 0 l .

SFX 1432 N 1
SFX 1432 0 L .

SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 0 Label .

SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 0 LabelAutoDelete .

SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 0 LabeledGraph .

SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 0 LabelMargins .

SFX 1437 N 1
SFX 1437 0 LabelPositioning .

SFX 1438 N 1
SFX 1438 0 Labels .

SFX 1439 N 1
SFX 1439 0 LabelStyle .

SFX 1440 N 1
SFX 1440 0 LabelTemplate .

SFX 1441 N 1
SFX 1441 0 Lambda .

SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 0 LambdaDistribution .

SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 0 lambert .

SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 0 lamberts .

SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 0 LAN .

SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 0 LaplaceTransform .

SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 0 lar .

SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 0 Largest .

SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 0 LargestBy .

SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 0 LastLayer .

SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 0 lateral .

SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 0 Latest .

SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 0 lay .

SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 0 Layer .

SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 0 Layout .

SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 0 lBox .

SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 0 lBoxOptions .

SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 0 le .

SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 0 leAlignments .

SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 0 leauClasses .

SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 0 leauQ .

SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 0 leauxToPermutation .

SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 0 led .

SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 0 leDepth .

SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 0 leDirections .

SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 0 LefflerE .

SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 0 leForm .

SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 0 Left .

SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 0 LeftArrow .

SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 0 LeftAssociate .

SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 0 LeftRightVector .

SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 0 LeftTeeVector .

SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 0 LeftVector .

SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 0 LeftVectorBar .

SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 0 Legend .

SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 0 Legends .

SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 0 leHeadings .

SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 0 Length .

SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 0 LerchPhi .

SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 0 les .

SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 0 leSpacing .

SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 0 less .

SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 0 Less .

SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 0 Level .

SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 0 leView .

SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 0 leViewBox .

SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 0 leViewBoxBackground .

SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 0 leViewBoxOptions .

SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 0 lewska .

SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 0 Lexicographic .

SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 0 LexicographicTableau .

SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 0 ley .

SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 0 lFunctionData .

SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 0 lgebraic .

SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 0 Library .

SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 0 libria .

SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 0 Light .

SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 0 lightQ .

SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 0 Lights .

SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 0 Limit .

SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 0 Line .

SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 0 Linearize .

SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 0 LinearRecurrence .

SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 0 LinebreakInformationPacket .

SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 0 LinePlot .

SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 0 Lines .

SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 0 LinesStyle .

SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 0 LineThickness .

SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 0 LinkEfficiency .

SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 0 List .

SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 0 ListBinary .

SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 0 Listen .

SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 0 Listener .

SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 0 ListLogPlot .

SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 0 ListPlot .

SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 0 Lists .

SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 0 ListStepPlot .
