Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
anharmonic/1378
BinaryRead/1510
Blue/1497,1573,2262,2345
Bold/1375
Bond/546,1510,1869,2390
ButcherPlot/479,1433,1670,1972
CadmiumYellow/1497
Carleman/1502
Catenate/1454
centimo/1447,1458,1480,1951,1952,1994
Close/570,1419,1649
CompleteGraph/1409,1869
Cosh/1332
DeviceRead/373,1452,1510,2236
DSolve/506,1335,2324
erythema/1431,1994
FactorSquareFree/1510
FactorTerms/1510
FeatureExtract/1350,1735,1742
First/387,1332,1335,1491,1795,1830
FixedPoint/1510
Fold/1510,1780,1781
Frame/352,363,570,1324,1433,1482,1546,1899,2137,2226,2228
GeoDistance/1510
HandlerFunctions/1422
Hann/1304,1824,2372
hexahedra/1431
HistogramTransform/1338
Hurwitz/1479,2407
InChI/1420
Indent/1309,1564
kilofoot/1443,1444
Kowa/1489
lacunar/1378,2390
Laguerre/1432
Last/1491
Launch/645,1419
Liouville/1441
Macau/1453
MailServerConnect/1350
Mangoldt/1441
Mathematica/1493,1677
Mittag/1466
Modular/1345,1347,1441
monomorph/1369
Nagel/1431
NestWhile/1510
NIntegrate/1337
NonNegative/1331,1902,1911
NonPositive/1331,1902,1911
OrderStar/1338,1424,1475,1825,2141,2149,2150,2406
Padding/1454
pala/1371,1372,1994,2158
Pane/352,363,1431,1456,1457,1463,2024,2025,2026
pentahedra/1431
PowerMod/1510
Primary/1470,1810,1965
PrimitiveRoot/1510
Property/1510,2324
quasiperiodic/1378
Record/1516,2033
ReIm/1438,1816,2137
Rotate/1433,1468,1499,1963,2050,2341
Runge/1428,1429,1430
SeaGreen/575,1497,1573
Skolem/1382,1384
SlateGray/575,1497
SpellingCorrection/1510
SteelBlue/1497
stotin/1410,1423,1765
tautomer/1369
Thread/1308
Transpose/1454,1790,2160
transversal/1378,1994
TravelDistance/1510
TrigFactor/1510
Tukey/1442,2372
Turkmen/1370
UnitVector/1454
Update/1341,2015
Wey/1431,1959
